Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6844
Nebraska-based covered entity under federal law; application; approval; conditions; director; issue agreement, when.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that an application made by a taxpayer that is a Nebraska-based covered entity as defined in 15 U.S.C. 4651 under the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) for America Act, Public Law 116-283, be approved upon receipt if:

(a) The taxpayer's application contains the items listed in subsection (2) of section 77-6827; and

(b) The taxpayer's application meets the federal eligibility requirements of the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) for America Act, Public Law 116-283.

(2) Not more than thirty days after receipt and approval of an application under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall issue to such taxpayer a written agreement conforming to the requirements of sections 77-6828, 77-6845, and 77-6846.

Laws 2023, LB92, § 82.